trunk/apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.mk.dix.xml
    <pardef n="кри/е__vblex">
	<!-- Imperative -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ј</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>јте</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	<!-- Present -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>јам</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еш</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еме</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ете</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>јат</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	<!-- Imperfect пред/е -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ев</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еше</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еше</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>евме</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>евте</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еа</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>	

	<!-- par: преде
		group: e
		cat_type: non-finite
	-->
    <pardef n="пред/е__vblex">
	<!-- Imperative -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ете</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	<!-- Present -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еш</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еме</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ете</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ат</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	<!-- Imperfect пред/е -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ев</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еше</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еше</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>евме</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>евте</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еа</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>	


		<!-- par: рече
		group: e
		cat_type: finite
		stem: no stem 
		-k insert -->
    <pardef n="ре/че__vblex">
	<!-- Imperative -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>чи</l>
          <r>че<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>чете</l>
          <r>че<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	<!-- Present -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>чам</l>
          <r>че<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>чеш</l>
          <r>че<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>че</l>
          <r>че<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>чеме</l>
          <r>че<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>чете</l>
          <r>че<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>чат</l>
          <r>че<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	<!-- Aorist дојд/е -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ков</l>
          <r>че<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>че</l>
          <r>че<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>че</l>
          <r>че<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ковме</l>
          <r>че<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ковте</l>
          <r>че<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>коа</l>
          <r>че<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

		<!-- par: влезе
		group: e
		cat_type: finite
		stem: no stem 
		-k insert -->

   <e lm="преде"><i>пред</i><par n="пред/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="јаде"><i>јад</i><par n="пред/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="пере"><i>пер</i><par n="пред/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="сере"><i>сер</i><par n="пред/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="пеe"><i>пе</i><par n="пред/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="влијае"><i>влија</i><par n="пред/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="трае"><i>тра</i><par n="пред/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="живее"><i>живе</i><par n="пред/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="владее"><i>владе</i><par n="пред/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="гине"><i>гин</i><par n="пред/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="расте"><i>раст</i><par n="пред/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="пие"><i>пи</i><par n="кри/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="спие"><i>спи</i><par n="кри/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="крие"><i>кри</i><par n="кри/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="рече"><i>ре</i><par n="ре/че__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="повлече"><i>повле</i><par n="ре/че__vblex"/></e>
